Maryland, session 2025, HB1098.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
20–306.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “COMPANY ACTION LEVEL RBC” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 4–301(N)(1) OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) THE FUND SHALL CALCULATE AND REPORT ITS RBC LEVEL IN
ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 4, SUBTITLE 3 OF THIS ARTICLE.
– 1 –

Ch. 395 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(C) (1) BEGINNING DECEMBER 31, 2026, THE FUND SHALL MAINTAIN
TOTAL ADJUSTED CAPITAL, AS DEFINED IN § 4–301(R) OF THIS ARTICLE, IN AN
AMOUNT THAT IS GREATER THAN OR EQUAL TO ITS COMPANY ACTION LEVEL RBC.
(2) THE FUND SHALL PREPARE AND SUBMIT AN RBC PLAN IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 4–305(B) OF THIS ARTICLE IF AN RBC REPORT FILED BY THE
FUND UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION SHOWS THAT THE FUND’S TOTAL
ADJUSTED CAPITAL:
(I) IS LESS THAN THE FUND’S COMPANY ACTION LEVEL RBC;
OR
(II) 1. IS LESS THAN THE PRODUCT OF 3.0 AND THE FUND’S
AUTHORIZED CONTROL LEVEL RBC, AS DEFINED IN § 4–301(N)(3) OF THIS ARTICLE;
AND
2. TRIGGERS THE TREND TEST CALCULATION INCLUDED
IN THE PROPERTY AND CASUALTY RBC INSTRUCTIONS.
(D) IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 4–305(D) OF THIS ARTICLE, THE
COMMISSIONER SHALL REVIEW AND DETERMINE THE ADEQUACY OF AN RBC PLAN
FILED BY THE FUND AS REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION.
20–507.
(a) Subject to the authority of the Commissioner to determine whether rates are
excessive, inadequate, or unfairly discriminatory, as provided in Title 11, Subtitle 2 OR
SUBTITLE 3 of this article, the Executive Director shall determine the premiums to be
charged on policies issued by the Fund.
(b) (1) Except as provided in [subsection] SUBSECTIONS (c) AND (D) of this
section, the provisions of Title 11, Subtitle 3 of this article apply to the determination of
premiums by the Executive Director and the filing of rates with the Commissioner.
(2) Notwithstanding Title 11, Subtitle 2 OR SUBTITLE 3 of this article or
any other provision of this title, the Executive Director may base premiums on one or both
of the following items:
(i) the number of points accumulated by an insured or applicant for
insurance under the point system provided for in Title 16, Subtitle 4 of the Transportation
Article; or
(ii) the prior claims experience of an insured or applicant for
insurance.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 395
(C) THE PROVISIONS OF TITLE 11, SUBTITLE 2 OF THIS ARTICLE APPLY TO
THE DETERMINATION OF PREMIUMS BY THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR AND THE FILING
OF RATES WITH THE COMMISSIONER:
(1) BETWEEN JULY 1, 2025, AND DECEMBER 31, 2025, BOTH
INCLUSIVE; AND
(2) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2026, IF THE RBC REPORT MOST
RECENTLY FILED BY THE FUND SHOWS THAT THE FUND’S TOTAL ADJUSTED
CAPITAL IS LESS THAN THE AMOUNT REQUIRED UNDER § 20–306(C)(1) § 20–306(C)
OF THIS TITLE.
[(c)] (D) (1) Premiums for all commercial coverage shall be determined in
accordance with this section and § 20–508 of this subtitle.
(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of this subsection, the rating principles
under subsection [(d)] (E) of this section may not be used to determine the premium for
commercial coverage.
[(d)] (E) In reviewing rates filed by the Fund, the Commissioner shall consider
not only the rating principles under Title 11, Subtitle 2 OR SUBTITLE 3 of this article but
also the statutory purpose of the Fund under § 20–301 of this title.
[(e)] (F) (1) The Motor Vehicle Administration and Executive Director may
arrange for the Motor Vehicle Administration to collect premiums on policies issued by the
Fund when the Motor Vehicle Administration issues a driver’s license or certificate of
registration.
(2) A premium collected under this subsection shall be paid to the State
Treasurer for the account of the Fund.
[(f)] (G) (1) The Fund may not provide directly or indirectly for the financing
of premiums.
(2) A premium may be financed only by a premium finance company
registered with the Commissioner in accordance with § 23–201 of this article.
(3) If a prospective insured’s initial payment to the Fund, a fund producer,
or premium finance company is not honored, a policy or endorsement issued in reliance on
that payment is void.
[(g)] (H) (1) (i) Subject to the approval of the Commissioner and in
accordance with this subsection, the Fund may accept premiums on an installment
payment basis.
– 3 –

Ch. 395 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) In approving the Fund’s plan for accepting premiums on an
installment payment basis, the Commissioner shall:
1. consider as factors:
A. the percentage of the initial premium payment in
comparison to the total premium under the policy;
B. the number of installment premium payments accepted on
a policy under the installment payment plan; and
C. the overall affordability of the installment payment plan
in comparison to other payment options available to the policyholder; and
2. ensure that the Fund’s installment payment plan
meets the requirements of § 27–216 of this article.
(2) The Fund may not discriminate among insureds by charging different
premiums to insureds who select, as a payment option, the Fund’s installment payment
plan instead of a premium finance agreement.
(3) In determining commissions paid to a fund producer, the Fund may not
consider whether the fund producer placed an insured in an installment payment plan.
(4) (i) In accordance with this paragraph, written and electronic
communications, including the Fund’s website, affecting the placement of coverage by the
Fund or a fund producer shall include a statement, on a form approved by the
Commissioner, advising an applicant or an insured of the payment options available to the
applicant or insured.
(ii) The statement shall state that the applicant or insured has the
following payment options:
1. the Fund’s installment payment plan;
2. a premium finance agreement; or
3. payment of the policy in full.
(iii) The statement shall be included on written or electronic
communications at the time the applicant or insured:
1. is issued a new policy; or
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 395
2. is issued a reissuance, rewrite, or renewal of an existing
policy.
(iv) The statement shall state that the applicant or insured should
consult a fund producer who will fully describe the terms of each payment option.
[(h)] (I) (1) If the Fund makes a change to its plan for accepting premiums
on an installment payment basis, within 90 days after the change, the Commissioner shall
submit a report to the General Assembly providing the reason for the change.
(2) The report required under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall:
(i) include the effect the change will have on the required factors for
consideration under [(g)(1)(ii)1] SUBSECTION (H)(1)(II)1 of this section; and
(ii) be submitted in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) (1) The Maryland Insurance Administration shall establish a workgroup
to study:
(1) (i) the affordability of private passenger automobile insurance in
the State, including factors that contribute to premium rate increases and trends in rate
increases;
(2) (ii) policy options to provide greater transparency regarding
automobile insurance premiums and to increase the affordability of automobile insurance
in the State;
(3) (iii) ways in which the term “affordability” has been or may be
defined in the context of the establishment of private passenger automobile insurance
premium rates; and
(4) (iv) methodologies by which affordability can be considered in
establishing private passenger automobile insurance rates consistent with rate making
principles codified in the Insurance Article; and
(v) the current financial status of private passenger automobile
insurers in the State and potential options to address excess profits.
(2) In conducting the study under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the
workgroup shall seek and consider input from relevant stakeholders, including the
reinsurance industry.
– 5 –

Ch. 395 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) The workgroup consists of the following members:
(1) one member of the Senate of Maryland who is a member of the Finance
Committee, appointed by the President of the Senate;
(2) one member of the House of Delegates who is a member of the Economic
Matters Committee, appointed by the Speaker of the House;
(3) the Maryland Insurance Commissioner or the Commissioner’s
designee;
(4) the Executive Director of the Maryland Automobile Insurance Fund, or
the Executive Director’s designee; and
(5) the following members, appointed by the chair of the workgroup:
(i) one representative of an automobile insurer or automobile
insurer trade association; and
(ii) one representative of a consumer advocacy group that is active
in the area of automobile insurance; and
(iii) one representative of private passenger automobile insurance
producers in the State.
(c) The Maryland Insurance Commissioner or the Commissioner’s designee shall
chair the workgroup.
(d) On or before January 1, 2026, the workgroup shall report its findings and
recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before March 15, 2026,
for calendar year 2025 operating results only, the Board of Trustees of the Maryland
Automobile Insurance Fund may certify the greater of:
(1) the calculation yielded under § 20–404(b) and (c) of the Insurance
Article; and
(2) an amount not to exceed $20,000,000.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. Section 2 of this Act shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and, at the end of
June 30, 2026, Section 2 of this Act, with no further action required by the General
Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 395
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 7 –